District of Columbia statutes.
5-525.02

Applicability.

If funds deposited under § 5-525.01(b) are sufficient to fully satisfy the District’s obligations arising from the decision of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals inDistrict of Columbia Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department v. District of Columbia Public Employee Relations Board, et al., 105 A.3d 992 (D.C. 2014) , as certified by the Chief Financial Officer, § 5-525.01 shall not apply.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7093, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7063 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).